Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.470

Grant program—Advisory committee.

(1) The secretary of state shall create an advisory committee and adopt rules governing project eligibility, evaluation, awarding of grants, and other criteria for administering the local government grant program, which may include a preference for grants that include a match of local funds.

(2) The advisory committee shall review grant proposals and establish a prioritized list of projects to be considered for funding by the third Tuesday in May of each year beginning in 2004 and continuing as long as funds in the election account established by RCW 29A.04.440 are available. The grant award may have an effective date other than the date the project is placed on the prioritized list, including money spent previously by the county that would qualify for reimbursement under the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252).

(3) Examples of projects that would be eligible for local government grant funding include, but are not limited to the following:

(a) Replacement or upgrade of voting equipment, including the replacement of punch card voting systems;

(b) Purchase of additional voting equipment, including the purchase of equipment to meet the disability requirements of the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);

(c) Purchase of new election management system hardware and software capable of integrating with the statewide voter registration system required by the Help America Vote Act (P.L. 107-252);

(d) Development and production of election worker training materials;

(e) Voter education programs;

(f) Publication of a local voters' pamphlet;

(g) Toll-free access system to provide notice of the outcome of provisional ballots; and

(h) Training for local election officials.

[ 2011 c 10 s 10; 2004 c 267 s 203.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.